Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
BOARD OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Cross references.

- Board of Natural Resources, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. VI, Para. I.

Law reviews.

-
For survey of Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).

12-2-20. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Natural Resources Act of 1973."

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 139, § 1.)

12-2-21. Composition of Board of Natural Resources; appointment and confirmation of members; terms of members; vacancies.

The Board of Natural Resources shall consist of one member from each congressional district in this state; one additional member from one of the following named counties: Chatham, Bryan, Liberty, McIntosh, Glynn, or Camden; and four members from the state at large. The members shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this Code section, members shall be appointed for a term of seven years from the expiration of the previous term. The four members from the state at large shall be appointed initially for terms of one, three, five, and seven years, respectively, to be designated by the Governor; all succeeding appointments of at-large members shall be for a term of seven years. In as far as it is practical, the members of the Board of Natural Resources shall be representative of all areas and functions encompassed within the Department of Natural Resources. All members of the Board of Natural Resources shall hold office until their successors are appointed and qualified. Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor and submitted to the Senate for confirmation at the next session of the General Assembly after the making of the appointment. Any member so appointed shall serve until the expiration of the vacated term. No more than two members shall come from the same congressional district.

(Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 3, 5, 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1527; Ga. L. 1973, p. 139, § 3.)

Cross references.

- Board of Natural Resources, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. VI, Para. I.

12-2-22. Oath of office; bond.

Persons appointed to the Board of Natural Resources shall take oath of office and give bond in the sum of $1,000.00 in the usual form required of state officers.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 139, § 4.)

Cross references.

- Official bonds, T. 45, C. 4.

12-2-23. Officers; meetings; quorum; compensation of members; reimbursement of members for expenses.

The members of the Board of Natural Resources shall elect a chairman, a vice-chairman, and a secretary. These officers shall be elected for a period of one year and shall be elected annually at the January meeting.

The board shall hold regular meetings at least once every 60 days and may not hold more than six special or called meetings in any one calendar year. A special or called meeting may be called by the chairman or a majority of the members of the board. The board shall meet at such times and at such designated places in this state as it may determine.

Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The members, including the chairperson, shall each receive the per diem prescribed in Code Section 45-7-21 for each day of actual attendance at meetings of the board, or any committee thereof, and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses, lodging, meals, and transportation at the same rates established in the travel regulations for state employees. The members, including the chairperson, while on committee assignment approved in advance by the chairperson, shall receive the same per diem and reimbursement of travel expenses as those authorized for attendance at meetings. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, the total per diem compensation paid in any year to any member of the board shall not exceed $3,000.00. Such per diem and actual expense shall be paid from funds of the department.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 139, § 5; Ga. L. 2011, p. 558, § 1/SB 121.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

12-2-24. Powers and duties of Board of Natural Resources; rules and regulations; fee refunds; policies.

The Board of Natural Resources may make such rules and regulations as it may deem advisable to govern the work of the department and the duties of its employees under this title.

Without limiting paragraph (1) of this subsection, the board may establish, by rule or regulation, a procedure to refund fees collected in error or overpayment or to which the department or state is not otherwise entitled.

The Board of Natural Resources shall have the power to establish the general policies to be followed by the department.

The commissioner of natural resources shall have the power to administer the department pursuant to the general policies established by the Board of Natural Resources.

(Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 1; Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, §§ 1, 4, 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, §§ 1, 2, 14; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1527; Ga. L. 1973, p. 344, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 12; Ga. L. 2011, p. 558, § 2/SB 121.)

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of Board of Natural Resources relating to vehicle emissions,

§

12-9-40

et seq.

Rule-making power of Board of Natural Resources with regard to game and wildlife,

§

27-1-4

.

Rule-making power of Board of Natural Resources with regard to registration, operation, and sale of watercraft,

§

52-7-23

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Administration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Chapter 391-1 et seq.